Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1932.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3129 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is repealed:[§ 3129. Sexual intercourse with animal.A person who engages in any form of sexual intercourse with an animal commits a misdemeanor of the second degree.]Section 2. Section 5531 of Title 18 is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 5531. Definitions.* * *"Sexual contact with an animal." An act committed between an 1234567891011121314151617181920 individual and an animal involving:(1) Contact between the sex organs or anus of an animal and the mouth, sex organs or anus of an individual.(2) The insertion of any part of an animal's body into the vaginal or anal opening of an individual.(3) Except as provided in section 5534.1(b) (relating to aggravated cruelty to animal), the insertion of any part of the body of an individual or any foreign object into the vaginal or anal opening of an animal.* * *Section 3. Section 5534(b) of Title 18 is amended to read:§ 5534. Aggravated cruelty to animal.* * *(b) Grading.--[A](1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a violation of this section is a felony of the third degree.(2) A violation of subsection (a)(1) is a felony of the second degree if the violation occurs in the presence of a minor under 13 years of age.Section 4. Title 18 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5534.1. Sexual crimes against animals.(a) Offense defined. -- A person commits an offense if the person intentionally or knowingly does any of the following:(1) Engages in sexual contact with an animal.(2) Possesses, sells, transfers, purchases or otherwise obtains an animal with the intent that it be subject to sexual contact.(3) Organizes, promotes, conducts, aids or participates in as an observer any act involving sexual contact with an animal.20250HB1932PN2431 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Causes, coerces or aids another person to engage in sexual contact with an animal.(5) Permits sexual contact with an animal to be conducted on any premises under the person's charge or control.(6) Advertises, solicits, offers or accepts the offer of an animal with the intent that the animal be used for sexual contact.(b) Construction.-- This section shall not be construed to prohibit any of the following:(1) Accepted veterinary medicine practices.(2) Artificial insemination of an animal for reproductive purposes.(3) Normal agricultural operation practices and procedures.(4) Accepted animal husbandry or animal care, including grooming, raising, breeding, assisting with the birthing process of animals or any other practice that provides care for an animal.(5) Accepted practices of judging breed conformation.(c) Grading.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), a violation of this section is a felony of the third degree.(2) A violation of subsection (a)(1) or (4) is a felony of the second degree if the violation occurred in the presence of a minor.(d) Additional penalty.--In addition to any other penalty imposed, a person convicted of violating this section shall be ordered to:(1) Relinquish custody of all animals under the person's 20250HB1932PN2431 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 control. If the person convicted of violating this section is not the owner of the animal that was the subject of the violation, the animal shall be returned to the owner of the animal.(2) Not harbor, own, possess or exercise control over any animal for no less than five years.(3) For a period of time not less than five years, not:(i) reside in any household where an animal is present;(ii) engage in an occupation, whether paid or unpaid, involving animals; or(iii) participate in a volunteer position at any establishment where animals are present.Section 5. Section 5560 of Title 18 is amended to read:§ 5560. Exemption of normal agricultural operations.Sections 5532 (relating to neglect of animal), 5533 (relating to cruelty to animal), 5534 (relating to aggravated cruelty to animal), 5534.1 (relating to sexual crimes against animals), 5536 (relating to tethering of unattended dog) and 5543 (relating to animal fighting) shall not apply to activity undertaken in a normal agricultural operation.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1932PN2431 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122